Utah statutes.
63L-5-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Free exercise of religion" means an act or refusal to act that is
substantially motivated by sincere religious belief, whether or not the act or
refusal is compulsory or central to a larger system of religious belief, and
includes the use, building, or conversion of real property for the purpose of
religious exercise.
(2)  "Government entity" means the state, a county, a municipality, a higher
education institution, a local district, a special service district, any other
political subdivision of the state, or any administrative subunit of any of
them.
(3)  "Land use regulation" means any state or local law or ordinance, whether
statutory or otherwise, that limits or restricts a person's use or development
of land or a structure affixed to land.
(4)  "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, or other legal
entity that owns an interest in real property.
